District of Columbia statutes.
29-808.01

Direct action by member.

(a)

Subject to subsection (b) of this section, a member may maintain a direct action in the Superior Court against another member, a manager, or the limited liability company to enforce the member’s rights and otherwise protect the member’s interests, including rights and interests under the operating agreement or this chapter or arising independently of the membership relationship.

(b)

A member maintaining a direct action under this section shall plead and prove an actual or threatened injury that is not solely the result of an injury suffered or threatened to be suffered by the limited liability company.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-804.09 and § 29-806.01.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 901 of the Uniform Limited Company Act (2006 Act).